North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-01 County Poor Relief, Administration

50-01-01.
Human service zone obligated to support poor — Eligibility for assistance. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Within the limits of the human service zone appropriation, each human service zone in this state is obligated, upon receipt of a written application, to provide general assistance to persons who are residents of the human service zone and who are eligible. To be eligible for general assistance, the applicant:

May not have made, before or after making an application for general assistance, an assignment or transfer of property for the purpose of rendering the applicant eligible for assistance.

Shall comply with the written eligibility standards for general assistance established by the human service zone director or department of human services. A copy of the written standards must be available upon request. Pursuant to this requirement, the ownership of property by an applicant for general assistance, or by the spouse of the applicant, either individually or jointly, or of insurance on the life of the applicant does not preclude the granting of assistance if the applicant is without funds for the applicant’s support.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 33, § 5; R.C. 1895, § 1478; R.C. 1899, § 1478; R.C. 1905, § 1854; S.L. 1907, ch. 183, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2501; S.L. 1933, ch. 97, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 50-0101; S.L. 1971, ch. 463, § 1; 1979, ch. 506, § 2; 1991, ch. 504, § 1; 1993, ch. 2, § 14; 1995, ch. 456, § 5; 2019, ch. 391, § 45, effective January 1, 2020.

50-01-01.
Human service zone obligated to support poor — Eligibility for assistance. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Within the limits of the human service zone appropriation, each human service zone in this state is obligated, upon receipt of a written application, to provide general assistance to persons who are residents of the human service zone and who are eligible. To be eligible for general assistance, the applicant:

May not have made, before or after making an application for general assistance, an assignment or transfer of property for the purpose of rendering the applicant eligible for assistance.

Shall comply with the written eligibility standards for general assistance established by the human service zone director or department of health and human services. A copy of the written standards must be available upon request. Pursuant to this requirement, the ownership of property by an applicant for general assistance, or by the spouse of the applicant, either individually or jointly, or of insurance on the life of the applicant does not preclude the granting of assistance if the applicant is without funds for the applicant’s support.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 33, § 5; R.C. 1895, § 1478; R.C. 1899, § 1478; R.C. 1905, § 1854; S.L. 1907, ch. 183, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2501; S.L. 1933, ch. 97, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 50-0101; S.L. 1971, ch. 463, § 1; 1979, ch. 506, § 2; 1991, ch. 504, § 1; 1993, ch. 2, § 14; 1995, ch. 456, § 5; 2019, ch. 391, § 45, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 352, § 376, effective September 1, 2022.

50-01-01.1.
Determination of eligibility — Notice — Appeal.

The human service zone director or the director’s designee is responsible for determining, within a reasonable period of time, an applicant’s eligibility for general assistance under this chapter. The applicant must be provided written notice of the determination. The notice must include the reasons for the determination, as well as an explanation of the applicant’s right to a timely appeal of the determination to the human service zone board if aggrieved by the decision. Decisions of the human service zone board regarding appeals taken pursuant to this section are subject to judicial review in the manner prescribed by chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 506, § 1; 1995, ch. 456, § 6; 2019, ch. 391, § 46, effective January 1, 2020.

50-01-02.
General assistance jurisdiction.

The human service zone, through the human service zone director, or the director’s designee, has exclusive jurisdiction and control of the administration of general assistance within the human service zone, except as otherwise provided in this title.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 33, § 4; R.C. 1895, § 1477; R.C. 1899, § 1477; R.C. 1905, § 1853; S.L. 1913, ch. 121, § 4; C.L. 1913, § 2499; S.L. 1933, ch. 97, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 50-0102; S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 7; 2019, ch. 391, § 47, effective January 1, 2020.

Cross-References.

Administrative responsibilities of county manager, see § 11-09-14.

Right of state over poor, see §§ 54-01-18, 54-01-19.

50-01-03.
County social service board may accept property or security. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 121, § 11; C.L. 1913, § 2508; S.L. 1933, ch. 97, § 11; R.C. 1943, § 50-0103; S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 8; repealed by 2019, ch. 391, § 139, effective January 1, 2020.

50-01-04.
Records to be kept.

Every person who administers general assistance shall maintain reasonable records.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 33, § 10; R.C. 1895, § 1482; R.C. 1899, § 1482; R.C. 1905, § 1858; S.L. 1913, ch. 121, § 14; C.L. 1913, § 2511; S.L. 1933, ch. 97, § 21; R.C. 1943, § 50-0104; S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 9; 2019, ch. 391, § 48, effective January 1, 2020.

50-01-05.
Reports to county social service board. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 25.

50-01-06.
Blanks and reports prepared by counties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 25.

50-01-07.
County social service board — Members — Qualifications. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 25.

50-01-07.1.
County social service board to be substituted for county welfare board. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 25.

50-01-08.
Members of county social service board — Term of office — Oath — Compensation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 25.

50-01-08.1.
Out-of-state travel approval. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 25.

50-01-09.
Duties of county social service board. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 25.

50-01-09.1.
Reimbursement of county for public assistance to nonresidents occasioned by federal projects. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 25.

50-01-09.2.
Allocation to counties by state for poor relief expenditures. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 2, § 27.

50-01-10.
Removal of members of the board. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 25.

50-01-11.
Investigation of application for poor relief. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

50-01-12.
Relief provided when residence uncertain. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 25.

50-01-13.
Medical attention and hospitalization furnished to poor. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Within the limits of the human service zone appropriation, the human service zone promptly shall provide necessary medical services, covered in the written eligibility standards for general assistance, for any poor person in the human service zone who is not provided for in a public institution. The human service zone shall cause to be furnished to the person the necessary covered medicines prescribed by a physician. Necessary covered hospitalization must be furnished by the human service zone upon approval or subsequent ratification by the human service zone director or the director’s designee. If the poor person is a nonresident of the state, the human service zone furnishing the medical services must be reimbursed within the limits of funds appropriated for that purpose by the legislative assembly for eighty percent of the expenses incurred in carrying out this section. The reimbursement must be made upon vouchers having the approval of the department of human services.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 33, § 6; R.C. 1895, § 1479; R.C. 1899, § 1479; R.C. 1905, § 1855; S.L. 1913, ch. 121, § 6; C.L. 1913, § 2502; S.L. 1929, ch. 107, § 1; 1933, ch. 97, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 50-0113; S.L. 1951, ch. 283, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 50-0113; S.L. 1963, ch. 200, § 16; 1995, ch. 34, § 13; 1995, ch. 456, § 10; 2019, ch. 391, § 49, effective January 1, 2020.

50-01-13.
Medical attention and hospitalization furnished poor. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Within the limits of the human service zone appropriation, the human service zone promptly shall provide necessary medical services, covered in the written eligibility standards for general assistance, for any poor person in the human service zone who is not provided for in a public institution. The human service zone shall cause to be furnished to the person the necessary covered medicines prescribed by a physician. Necessary covered hospitalization must be furnished by the human service zone upon approval or subsequent ratification by the human service zone director or the director’s designee. If the poor person is a nonresident of the state, the human service zone furnishing the medical services must be reimbursed within the limits of funds appropriated for that purpose by the legislative assembly for eighty percent of the expenses incurred in carrying out this section. The reimbursement must be made upon vouchers having the approval of the department of health and human services.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 33, § 6; R.C. 1895, § 1479; R.C. 1899, § 1479; R.C. 1905, § 1855; S.L. 1913, ch. 121, § 6; C.L. 1913, § 2502; S.L. 1929, ch. 107, § 1; 1933, ch. 97, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 50-0113; S.L. 1951, ch. 283, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 50-0113; S.L. 1963, ch. 200, § 16; 1995, ch. 34, § 13; 1995, ch. 456, § 10; 2019, ch. 391, § 49, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 352, § 377, effective September 1, 2022.

50-01-14.
Restrictions on aid furnished nonresidents. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 25.

50-01-15.
Transportation not furnished to nonresident. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 25.

50-01-16.
Complaint in behalf of the poor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 25.

50-01-17.
Person required to work.

If a person applying for general assistance is able to work, or if any member of that person’s family is able to work, the human service zone in which the person is a resident may insist that those able to work seek employment and the human service zone director or the director’s designee may refuse to furnish any assistance until it is satisfied that the person claiming assistance is endeavoring to find work. The human service zone may attempt to secure, for a person claiming general assistance, who is able to work, employment in the county where the person resides and may call upon residents of the county to aid the human service zone in finding work for that person.

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 121, § 9; C.L. 1913, § 2506; S.L. 1933, ch. 97, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 50-0117; S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 11; 2019, ch. 391, § 50, effective January 1, 2020.

50-01-17.1.
Work requirement conditions.

If a person applying for general assistance is able to work, the human service zone director or the director’s designee, at its option, may require the applicant to comply with any or all of the following provisions as a condition to receiving general assistance:

To register with job service North Dakota.

To participate in work incentive programs in accordance with the guidelines established for public assistance programs.

To accept work which is available through community work experience programs.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 485, § 1; 1995, ch. 456, § 12; 2019, ch. 391, § 51, effective January 1, 2020.

50-01-17.2.
Community work experience programs — Development. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services may develop community work experience programs through agreements with any public entity, nonprofit agency or organization, or in conjunction with, or through utilization of, applicable federal programs. The number of hours to be worked may be determined by dividing the amount of the assistance payment by the prevailing minimum wage.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 485, § 2; 2019, ch. 391, § 52, effective January 1, 2020.

50-01-17.2.
Community work experience programs — Development. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services may develop community work experience programs through agreements with any public entity, nonprofit agency or organization, or in conjunction with, or through utilization of, applicable federal programs. The number of hours to be worked may be determined by dividing the amount of the assistance payment by the prevailing minimum wage.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 485, § 2; 2019, ch. 391, § 52, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 352, § 378, effective September 1, 2022.

50-01-17.3.
Community work experience program requirements.

Any community work experience program established pursuant to this chapter must provide:

That appropriate health, safety, and work conditions exist.

That the program does not result in displacement of persons currently employed.

That the program does not apply to jobs covered by a collective bargaining agreement.

That recipients will not be required to travel an unreasonable distance from their homes or to remain away from their homes overnight.

That the human service zone shall provide for transportation and all other costs reasonably necessary for and directly related to a recipient’s participation in the program.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 485, § 3; 2019, ch. 391, § 53, effective January 1, 2020.

50-01-17.4.
Community work experience program participation.

No recipient may be required to participate in a work experience program if:

The position offered is vacant because of a strike, lockout, or other labor dispute.

The recipient would be required to join a company union or to resign from or refrain from joining any legitimate labor organization.

Participation would impose a hardship on the recipient or the recipient’s family because of illness, physical or mental disability, or remoteness of the recipient’s residence from the place of employment.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 485, § 4.

50-01-17.5.
Refusal to comply with work requirements — Denial of relief.

Refusal of any applicant or recipient, without good cause, to comply with any work requirements established pursuant to this chapter may be grounds for denial or termination of general assistance.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 485, § 5; 1995, ch. 456, § 13; 2019, ch. 391, § 54, effective January 1, 2020.

50-01-18.
Refusal of poor person to work. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 485, § 6.

50-01-19.
Duty of relative to aid — Right of recovery by county. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 97, § 10; R.C. 1943, § 50-0119; S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 14; repealed by 2019, ch. 129, § 2, effective March 22, 2019.

50-01-20.
Assistance by relatives. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 25.

50-01-21.
County and department have preferred claim against estate of recipient of county general assistance or general assistance.

Funds used for subsistence, medical, hospital, or burial expenses of a recipient of county general assistance or general assistance may not be considered as gifts, and the county and department have a preferred claim against the estate of any person who has received county general assistance or general assistance for funds expended for that person and that person’s legal dependents. The statute of limitations does not run on this type of claim.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 137, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 50-0121; S.L. 1957, ch. 220, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 50-0121; S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 15; 2019, ch. 391, § 56, effective January 1, 2020.

Cross-References.

Support of child by county, liability of parent’s estate, see § 14-09-12.

50-01-22.
Actions and proceedings — Duty of state’s attorneys. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 25.

50-01-23.
Sending pauper out of county unlawful — Prosecution. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

50-01-24.
Penalty for bringing pauper into the county. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

50-01-25.
Fraudulent acts — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

50-01-26.
Human service zone of residence for county general assistance purposes.

A person who has residence in this state, for general assistance purposes, is a resident of the human service zone in which the person is living on other than a temporary basis. If a person is living in a human service zone on a temporary basis, the person is a resident of the human service zone in which the person most recently lived other than on a temporary basis.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 16; 2019, ch. 391, § 57, effective January 1, 2020.

50-01-27.
State of residence for county general assistance purposes.

A person who is a resident of this state for purposes of chapter 50-24.5 is a resident of this state for county general assistance purposes. If a person moves from this state for other than a temporary purpose, the person’s residency in this state for county general assistance purposes is lost. Residency in this state is presumed lost if:

The person plans to be absent or has been absent from this state for one year or longer; or

The person receives any form of public or general assistance, while in another state, which is available only to residents of that state.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 16; 2019, ch. 391, § 58, effective January 1, 2020.

50-01-28.
Change of residence to another human service zone.

If a person who is receiving general assistance in one human service zone becomes a resident of another human service zone in this state, the human service zone from which the person moves shall forward appropriate records and files to the new human service zone of residence.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 16; 2019, ch. 391, § 59, effective January 1, 2020.

50-01-29.
Persons with uncertain residence.

If the residence of a person is uncertain for general assistance purposes, the human service zone in which the person lives shall provide county general assistance until that person’s residence is determined.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 16; 2019, ch. 391, § 60, effective January 1, 2020.